District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

10-1001

Establishment of the Department of Real Estate Services.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1802, 45 DCR 7193
Mar. 11, 2010, D.C. Law 18-115, § 3(a), (b), 57 DCR 886
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1032(a), 58 DCR 6226

History

1981 Ed., § 9-1101.

Prior Codifications

For temporary addition of section, see § 1402 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 1402 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary abolition, as of October 1, 1998, of the Department of Administrative Services, established under Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1983, effective March 1, 1983, see § 1408 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and § 1408 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 11, and abolishment of the Department of Administrative Services, see §§ 1402 to 1406 and 1408 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2302 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1012(a) of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).

Emergency Legislation

Short Title

Short title of title XXIV of Law 14-190: Section 2401 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that title XXIV of the act may be cited as the Zoning Additional Space Needs and Stipends Amendment Act of 2002.

Short title: Section 1001 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle A of title I of the act may be cited as the “Late Fee Avoidance Act of 2008”.

Office of Property Management Establishment Act of 1998: Section 1801 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that subtitle A of title XVIII of the act may be cited as the “Office of Property Management Establishment Act of 1998.”

Re-Designation of the District of Columbia Office of Property Management as the District of Columbia Department of Real Estate Services, see Mayor’s Order 2009-131, July 17, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6884).

Mayor's Orders

Editor's Notes

Sections 1002, 1003 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided:

“Sec. 1002. Responsibility for late fees.

“(a) The Office of Finance and Resource Management and the Office of Property Management shall pay an equal share of any fees incurred by the District of Columbia if both agencies are responsible for the late payment for the consumption of energy commodities, including electricity, natural gas, heating fuel, steam, and water; provided, that if one agency is responsible for the late payment, that agency shall pay the full fee incurred by the District of Columbia.

“(b) Funds used to pay late fees shall not be intra-District funds collected from assessments to District agencies for the payment of projected fixed-cost expenses.

“Sec. 1003. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of October 1, 2008.”

Department of Administrative Services abolished: Section 1808 of D.C. Law 12-175 abolished the Department of Administrative Services, established under Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1983, pursuant to § 404(b) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, ( D.C. Code § 1-227(b)). The Department of Administrative Services is abolished as of October 1, 1998.

Section 2402 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided: “The Office of Property Management shall provide additional space within the District government office building located at 441 4th Street, N.W. (‘One Judiciary Square’) to the Office of Zoning (‘OZ’) to address OZ’s increased space requirements. The space to be provided shall be set forth in a plan which shall be submitted by the Mayor to the Council not later than September 1, 2002.”

Section 68 of D.C. Law 19-171 amended this section as it existed prior to its repeal.